District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.119

Transacting business without certificate of authority; validity of contracts or corporate acts not impaired; liabilities.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 227, ch. 269, § 119
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.119.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.20.
1973 Ed., § 29-934f.